Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2,150
School board; duties.

Beginning May 1, 2018, the school board of each school district shall adopt a written policy to be implemented at the start of the 2018-19 school year which provides for standards and guidelines to accommodate absences related to pregnancy and child care for pregnant and parenting students. Such policy shall include procedures and provisions in conformance with the minimum standards set forth in any model policy developed by the State Department of Education pursuant to section 79-2,151 or shall meet the minimum standards set forth in such section and may include any other procedures and provisions the school board deems appropriate.

Laws 2017, LB427, § 2.